Maine, session 132, LD692.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Transfer. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State
Controller shall transfer to the unappropriated surplus of the General Fund $250,000 on or
before June 30, 2026 and $250,000 on or before June 30, 2027 of the funds received
pursuant to the Maine v. Google settlement and deposited to the account established
pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 203-A to be used solely for
activities identified in the court decree and approved by the Attorney General. Funds
transferred pursuant to this section must be provided to the Maine Public Broadcasting
Corporation to align state funding more closely with the statutory requirement to provide
emergency broadcast messaging for public safety.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PUBLIC BROADCASTING CORPORATION, MAINE
Maine Public Broadcasting Corporation 0033
Initiative: Provides additional one-time funds to align state funding more closely with the
statutory requirement to provide emergency broadcast messaging for public safety.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $250,000 $250,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $250,000 $250,000
Page 1 - 132LR1567(06)